Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
264

HIGHWAYS

Part I. Highways, Generally

Section

264-1 Public highways and trails

264-1.5 Emergency powers; traffic emergency zones

264-2 Owned by government

264-3 Disposal of abandoned public highway

264-4 Restoration of boundary markers

264-5 In lieu of other compensation

264-6 State highway not to be disturbed without
permit

264-7 Permits, fees, etc.

264-8 Specifications, standards, procedures

264-8.5 Repealed

264-9 Backfilling, repaving, repairing, expense
of

permit holder

264-10 Deposit of fees, etc.; inspectors

264-11 Performance bond

264-12 Penalty for violations

264-13 Easements, etc., along state highways

264-14 Permit and paving requirements

264-15 Highway advance acquisition; source of
funds

264-16 State highway clearing accounts

264-17 Public hearing

264-18 Use of highway fund for bikeways

264-19 Transportation improvement special fund

264-20 Flexibility in highway design; liability
of State,

counties, and public utilities

264-20.5 Complete streets

Part II. Federal-Aid Highways

264-21 Definitions

264-22 State highway department

264-23 Duties of director

264-24 Powers of director

264-25 Signs and markings on federal-aid highways

264-26 Combination of federal and state funds

264-27 Repealed

264-28 Federal-aid projects; mandatory on council

264-29 Council's authority

264-30 Transfers of county funds

264-31 Maintenance of federal-aid highways

264-32 Utility facility defined

264-33 Relocation of utility facilities

264-33.5 Underground installation of utility
facilities along

federal-aid highways; when required; when
waived

264-34 Portions of projects deemed one

264-35 Assistance for displaced families and
business

264-36 Conformance with county general or master
plans

Part III. State Highway System

264-41 Establishment

264-42 Authority to include other public highways
in

the state highway system

264-43 Responsibility

264-44 Maintenance of state highway system

264-45 Highway lighting

Part IV. Controlled-Access Facilities

264-61 Definition of a controlled-access facility

264-62 Authority to establish controlled-access
facilities

264-63 Acquisition of property

264-64 Design of controlled-access facility and
regulation,

restriction, or prohibition of access;
penalty

264-65 New and existing facilities;
grade-crossing

eliminations

264-66 Authority to enter into agreements

264-67 Local service roads

Part V. Outdoor Advertising

264-71 Definitions

264-72 Control of outdoor advertising

264-73 Regulations

264-74 Removal of nonconforming outdoor
advertising

264-75 Compensation for removal of outdoor
advertising

264-76 Unlawful outdoor advertising

264-77 Penalty

264-78 Interpretation

264-79 Agreements with the United States
authorized

Part VI. Junkyard Control

264-81 Short title

264-82 Purposes

264-83 Definitions

264-84 Control of junkyards

264-85 Junkyards lawfully in existence

264-86 Requirement as to screening

264-87 Authority to acquire interest in land for

removal and screening of existing
junkyards

264-88 Injunction

264-89 Interpretation

264-90 Agreements with the United States
authorized

Part VII. Control of Vending

264-101 Vending from highways prohibited

264-102 Penalty

Part VIII. Impact Fees

264-121 Definitions

264-122 Highway development special fund

264-123 Authority to assess impact fees; needs
assessment

study

264-124 Impact fees; director's consent

264-125 Refund of impact fees to county

264-126 Adoption of rules

264-127 Limitations on actions

Note

City and county of Honolulu to take ownership of specified
road or parcel upon acceptance of funds. L 2016, c 194, §4.

Roads commission; private roads disputes; reports to
2018-2019 legislature (ceases to exist June 30, 2018). L 2016, c 194, §2.

Cross References

Use, repair, and maintenance of public roads in ownership
dispute, see §46-15.9.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next